Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1332.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Artificial Intelligence in Political Advertisements Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence."(1) A machine-based system that can, for a given set of human-defined objectives, make predictions, recommendations or decisions influencing real or virtual environments, including the ability to:(i) perceive real and virtual environments;123456789101112131415161718 (ii) abstract perceptions made into models through analysis in an automated manner; and(iii) use model inference to formulate options for information or action based on outcomes under this paragraph.(2) The term includes generative artificial intelligence."Audio-visual advertisement." A television advertisement, radio advertisement, digital advertisement or other audiovisual advertisement, including an advertisement done through a telephone, robocall or text message."Footage." A collection of images and all other digital assets that depict or record an event or a person's presence at the event."Generative artificial intelligence." The class of models that emulate the structure and characteristics of input data to generate derived synthetic content."Image." A depiction, including a photograph, digital image, virtual tour, rendering, sketch or map or a substitute for a photograph, digital image, virtual tour, rendering, sketch or map."Political advertisement." An advertisement for the purpose of influencing public opinion with respect to a legislative, public policy, administrative or electoral matter or a controversial issue of public importance in order to influence the outcome of an election by means of an audio-visual advertisement, a print advertisement, mailings, telephone calls, publicly accessible Internet website, digital device, application or advertising platform."Print advertisement." A print or electronic newspaper 20260SB1332PN1740 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 advertisement, print or electronic magazine advertisement or billboard advertisement. The term does not include an advertisement in the classified section of a newspaper."Synthetic content." Information, including images, videos, audio clips or text, that has been significantly modified or generated by algorithms, including by artificial intelligence.Section 3. Notice of use of artificial intelligence in political advertisements.If a political advertisement contains footage or audio that was generated in whole or in part with the use of artificial intelligence, the political advertisement shall include, in a clear and conspicuous manner, a statement that the political advertisement contains footage or audio that was generated in whole or in part with the use of artificial intelligence. The following shall apply:(1) In the case of a political advertisement by means of a print advertisement or with text or graphic components, the statement shall be displayed in a manner that is able to be easily seen and read and include the date, time and origin of the content.(2) In the case of a political advertisement made by means of an audio-visual advertisement or with only audio and no text or graphic components, the statement shall be broadcast at the beginning of the advertisement as an audio tagline in a manner that is easily heard and include the date, time and origin of the content.Section 4. Enforcement.(a) Action.--A person who is adversely affected by the use of artificial intelligence in a political advertisement that does not contain the disclosure required under section 3 may 20260SB1332PN1740 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 bring an action in the appropriate court for declaratory or injunctive relief and actual damages.(b) Civil action.--The Attorney General, appropriate district attorney or person identified under subsection (a) may bring a civil action for violations of this act.(c) Damages.--A court of competent jurisdiction may award damages for a violation of this act. The court may award:(1) A civil fine that does not exceed $3,000.(2) Actual attorney fees and court costs.(3) Other legal and equitable relief as the court deems appropriate.Section 5. Applicability.The provisions of this act shall not apply to a political advertisement that was printed, broadcast, manufactured or produced before the effective date of this section.Section 6. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 30 days.20260SB1332PN1740 - 4 - 1234567891011121314151617